Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5930XC (3) 91 ss/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 99G.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. âCourier serviceâ means a person that 3 purchases and stores a share or ticket on behalf of a customer 4 located in this state and delivers the share or ticket, or the 5 prize from the share or ticket, to the customer in this state 6 as a for-profit service. 7 Sec. 2. Section 99G.24, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 8 following new subsection: 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 10. a. A retailer may sell a share or 10 ticket to a courier service that has entered into a written 11 agreement with the retailer pursuant to paragraph âbâ . A 12 retailer shall disclose the agreement to the administrator 13 within three business days after the execution of the 14 agreement. 15 b. A written agreement between a courier service and a 16 retailer to buy and sell shares and tickets must contain all 17 of the following terms: 18 (1) A requirement that a courier service only accept an 19 order for a share or ticket from a customer if the courier 20 service has determined through the use of geolocation software 21 that the customer is physically located in this state, and not 22 located on a federally recognized Indian reservation, at the 23 time the order is placed. 24 (2) A requirement that a courier service employ age 25 verification software that only allows a customer who is of 26 lawful age to purchase a share or ticket pursuant to section 27 99G.30 to order a share or ticket. 28 (3) A requirement that a courier service securely store a 29 share or ticket on behalf of a customer until the prize for the 30 share or ticket is redeemed at retail by the courier service 31 and picked up by or delivered to the customer, or until the 32 share or ticket is picked up by or delivered to the customer. 33 (4) A requirement that a courier service arrange the pickup 34 by or physical delivery to the customer of a share or ticket 35 -1- LSB 5930XC (3) 91 ss/ns 1/ 3 S.F. _____ winning a prize in excess of the amount that can be redeemed at 1 retail as provided by the commission by rule, for the customer 2 to then redeem the prize as otherwise provided by law. 3 (5) A requirement that a courier service maintain 4 appropriate controls for responsible play, including the use 5 of daily, weekly, or monthly limits that may be reduced by 6 the customer, as well as self-exclusion capabilities. The 7 agreement must also require advertisements and communications 8 from the courier service to comply with applicable responsible 9 gambling advertising guidelines. 10 (6) A requirement that a courier service only purchase 11 shares or tickets at a dedicated courier service terminal or 12 dedicated courier service self-service kiosk located at the 13 retailer using cash or an automated clearinghouse transaction. 14 (7) A provision allowing a courier service to assess a 15 reasonable fee to a customer for the cost of order fulfillment 16 and storage. 17 (8) A prohibition on the purchase of a share or ticket 18 through a courier service by a customer using a credit card. 19 (9) A requirement that the courier service annually obtain 20 a report from a firm nationally recognized for providing audit, 21 testing, or certification services that certifies that the 22 courier service is in compliance with the written agreement 23 between the courier service and the retailer, which the courier 24 service shall provide to the retailer. 25 c. The commission shall issue dedicated terminals or 26 self-service kiosks for use by courier services to retailers 27 contracted with a courier service pursuant to this subsection. 28 A retailer shall not commingle retail share and ticket sales 29 with sales to a courier service. 30 d. The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 31 to implement this subsection. 32